Colorado statutes. TITLE 17 Corrections
PART 4 PAROLE ELIGIBILITY AND DISCHARGE FROM CUSTODY
17-22.5-407. Genetic testing as condition of parole - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2001:

Entire section added, p. 957, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1153, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(2) added by revision, pp. 1690, 1693, §§ 8, 17.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2007. (See L. 2006, pp. 1690, 1693.)